Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 14.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-114
Change of designated office or agent
for service of process.

(ULLCA
114) (a) A limited liability company or foreign limited liability company
may change its designated office, its agent for service of process, or the
address of its agent for service of process by delivering to the Secretary
of State for filing a statement of change containing:

(1) the name of the company;

(2) the street and mailing
addresses of its current designated office;

(3) if the current designated office is to be changed,
the street and mailing addresses of the new designated office;

(4) the name and street
and mailing addresses and post office box number, if any, of its current agent
for service of process; and

(5) if the current agent for service of process or
an address of the agent is to be changed, the new information.

(b) Subject to subsection
(c) of section 21-121, a statement of change is effective when filed by the
Secretary of State.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 14.
January 1, 2011